Maine, session 132, LD2034.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §253, as amended by PL 2017, c. 466, §1, is further amended
by amending the section headnote to read:
§253. Commissioner's duties and powers
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §253, first ¶, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 693, §§5 and 8, is
amended to read:
The duties and powers of the commissioner shall be are as follows.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §253, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Support funding for educational programs and opportunities. The
commissioner may raise and expend private funds to support specific educational programs
and opportunities.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §253, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Promote public awareness. The commissioner may expend appropriated funds
for the purchase, production and distribution of promotional materials, including, but not
limited to, educational materials, branded merchandise and outreach materials, as part of
the department's efforts to support and promote public awareness and engagement related
to the department's programs, services and initiatives.